Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 1201, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 365, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1201), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1201. In Section 1101 et seq. of this title, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Antisemitism”, as defined by the International Holocaust
Remembrance Alliance (IHRA), is a certain perception of Jews, which
may be expressed as hatred toward Jews. Rhetorical and physical
Req. No. 10716 Page 1

mani festations of antisemitism are directed toward Jewish or non-
Jewish individuals or their property, toward Jewish community
institutions and religious facilities. For the purposes of this
section, Oklahoma adopts the working definition and examples of
antisemitism by the IHRA;
2. “Discriminatory practice” means a practice designated as
discriminatory under the terms of this act;
2. 3. “Equal”, with reference to sex as defined in Section 16
of this title, shall not be construed to mean same or identical, and
to differentiate between the sexes shall not necessarily be
construed to be treating the sexes unequally;
3. 4. “National origin” includes the national origin of an
ancestor; and
4. 5. “Person” includes an individual, association,
corporation, joint apprenticeship committee, joint-stock company,
labor union, legal representative, mutual company, partnership,
receiver, trust, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, unincorporated
organization, any other legal or commercial entity, the state, or
any governmental entity or agency.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10716 TKR 01/14/25


Req. No. 10716 Page 2